Rhode Island statutes. Title 22 General Assembly
Chapter 10 Lobbying

22-10-1.
[Repealed.]

History of Section.

P.L. 1988, ch. 436, § 2; Repealed by P.L. 2016, ch. 62, § 4, effective January 1, 2017; P.L. 2016, ch. 69, § 4, effective January 1, 2017.

22-10-1.1, 22-10-1.2.
[Repealed.]

22-10-2.
[Repealed.]

History of Section.

P.L. 1988, ch. 436, § 2; P.L. 2004, ch. 207, § 1; P.L. 2004, ch. 413, § 1; Repealed by P.L. 2016, ch. 62, § 4, effective January 1, 2017; P.L. 2016, ch. 69, § 4, effective January 1, 2017.

22-10-2.1.
[Repealed.]

22-10-3.
[Repealed.]

History of Section.

P.L. 1988, ch. 436, § 2; Repealed by P.L. 2016, ch. 62, § 4, effective January 1, 2017; P.L. 2016, ch. 69, § 4, effective January 1, 2017.

22-10-4.
[Repealed.]

History of Section.

P.L. 1988, ch. 436, § 2; Repealed by P.L. 2016, ch. 62, § 4, effective January 1, 2017; P.L. 2016, ch. 69, § 4, effective January 1, 2017.

22-10-4.1.
[Repealed.]

History of Section.

P.L. 1988, ch. 436, § 2; P.L. 1992, ch. 233, § 1; Repealed by P.L. 2016, ch. 62, § 4, effective January 1, 2017; P.L. 2016, ch. 69, § 4, effective January 1, 2017.

22-10-5.
[Repealed.]

History of Section.

P.L. 1988, ch. 436, § 2; Repealed by P.L. 2016, ch. 62, § 4, effective January 1, 2017; P.L. 2016, ch. 69, § 4, effective January 1, 2017.

22-10-6.
[Repealed.]

History of Section.

P.L. 1988, ch. 436, § 2; P.L. 2011, ch. 283, § 1; P.L. 2011, ch. 298, § 1; Repealed by P.L. 2016, ch. 62, § 4, effective January 1, 2017; P.L. 2016, ch. 69, § 4, effective January 1, 2017.

22-10-7.
[Repealed.]

History of Section.

P.L. 1988, ch. 436, § 2; Repealed by P.L. 2016, ch. 62, § 4, effective January 1, 2017; P.L. 2016, ch. 69, § 4, effective January 1, 2017.

22-10-8.
[Repealed.]

History of Section.

P.L. 1988, ch. 436, § 2; P.L. 2011, ch. 283, § 1; P.L. 2011, ch. 298, § 1; P.L. 2012, ch. 46, § 1; P.L. 2012, ch. 78, § 1; Repealed by P.L. 2016, ch. 62, § 4, effective January 1, 2017; P.L. 2016, ch. 69, § 4, effective January 1, 2017.

22-10-9.
[Repealed.]

History of Section.

P.L. 1988, ch. 436, § 2; P.L. 1992, ch. 238, § 1; P.L. 2000, ch. 361, § 1; P.L. 2000, ch. 505, § 1; P.L. 2004, ch. 207, § 1; P.L. 2004, ch. 413, § 1; P.L. 2005, ch. 11, § 1; P.L. 2006, ch. 428, § 4; P.L. 2006, ch. 429, § 4; P.L. 2008, ch. 264, § 1; P.L. 2008, ch. 451, § 1; Repealed by P.L. 2016, ch. 62, § 4, effective January 1, 2017; P.L. 2016, ch. 69, § 4, effective January 1, 2017.

22-10-10.
[Repealed.]

History of Section.

P.L. 1988, ch. 436, § 2; P.L. 2006, ch. 428, § 4; P.L. 2006, ch. 429, § 4; P.L. 2011, ch. 283, § 1; P.L. 2011, ch. 298, § 1; P.L. 2014, ch. 102, § 1; P.L. 2014, ch. 121, § 1; Repealed by P.L. 2016, ch. 62, § 4, effective January 1, 2017; P.L. 2016, ch. 69, § 4, effective January 1, 2017.

22-10-11.
[Repealed.]

History of Section.

P.L. 1988, ch. 436, § 2; P.L. 2004, ch. 207, § 1; P.L. 2004, ch. 413, § 1; Repealed by P.L. 2016, ch. 62, § 4, effective January 1, 2017; P.L. 2016, ch. 69, § 4, effective January 1, 2017.

22-10-12.
[Repealed.]

History of Section.

P.L. 1988, ch. 436, § 2; Repealed by P.L. 2016, ch. 62, § 4, effective January 1, 2017; P.L. 2016, ch. 69, § 4, effective January 1, 2017.